West Virginia, session 2026, SB1075.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9G. TOBACCO CESSATION INITIATIVE. §16-9G-3. Special revenue account. (a) There is hereby created the "Tobacco Cessation Initiative Program Special Revenue Account" in the State Treasury to be administered by the Director of the Bureau for Public Health. All moneys deposited into this special account shall be expended for the purposes set forth in this article, and are not authorized from collections but are to be made only in accordance with appropriation by the Legislature and in accordance with the provisions of §12-3-1 et seq. of this code and upon fulfillment of the provisions of §11B-2-1 et seq. of this code: Provided, That for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, expenditures are authorized from collections rather than pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature. Any balance, including accrued interest and other returns, remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year may not revert to the General Revenue Fund but shall remain in the fund and be expended as provided by this section.(b) Notwithstanding any provision of §11B-2-20 of this code to the contrary, on or before July 30, 2026, and each July 30 thereafter, the amount of $5 million from the interest and other return earned that may accrue on the moneys in the Revenue Shortfall Reserve Fund – Part B during the next preceding fiscal year shall be transferred to the Tobacco Cessation Initiative Program Special Revenue Account  and expended solely for the purposes set forth in this article.